en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Tool Stands > Saw Stands: Band Saw Stands; Miter Saw Stands; Table Saw Stands
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Bases para herramientas > Bases para sierras: Bases para sierra de cinta; Bases para sierra ingletadora; Bases para sierra de mesa
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Alet Stantları > Testere Stantları: Şerit Testere Stantları; Gönye Testere Stantları; Masa Testere Stantları
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > ที่ตั้งเครื่องมือ > ที่ตั้งเลื่อย: ที่ตั้งเลื่อยสายพาน; ที่ตั้งเลื่อยตัดองศา; ที่ตั้งโต๊ะเลื่อย
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Apoios de ferramentas > Suportes de serras: Suportes de serras de fita; Suportes para serras de esquadria; Suportes para serras de mesa
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 工具台 > 锯台: 带锯台; 斜切锯台; 台锯台
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Supports pour outils > Supports pour scies: Supports pour scies à ruban; Supports pour scies à onglet; Supports pour scies de table
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Gereedschapstandaarden > Zaagstandaarden: Bandzaagstandaarden; Verstekzaagstandaarden; Tafelzaagstandaarden
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 工具腳架 > 鋸檯: 帶鋸檯; 斜斷鋸檯; 桌鋸檯
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Stojala za orodje > Stojala za žage: Stojala za tračne žage; Stojala za poševne žage; Stojala za namizne žage
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Giá để dụng cụ > Cưa xẻ bàn: Giá đỡ cưa đai; Giá đỡ cưa cắt góc; Giá đỡ cưa tròn
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Szerszámállványok > Fűrészállványok: Szalagfűrészállványok; Gérvágófűrész-állványok; Asztalifűrész-állványok
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > 工具スタンド > のこぎりスタンド: バンドソースタンド; マイターソースタンド; テーブルソースタンド
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Stojany na náradie > Stojany na píly: Stojany na pásové píly; Stojany na pokosové píly; Stojany na stolové píly
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Werkzeugständer > Sägeständer: Bandsägenständer; Gehrungssägenständer; Tischsägenständer
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Pracovní stojany > Pilové stojany: Stojany pro pásové pily; Stojany pro pokosové pily; Stojany pro stolové pily
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Verktygsställ > Sågställ: Bandsågsstativ; Geringssågstativ; Bordssågstativ
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Suporturi pentru scule > Suporturi pentru ferăstraie: Suporturi pentru ferăstraie-bandă; Suporturi pentru ferăstraie-bandă; Suporturi pentru ferăstraie de masă
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Įrankių stovai > Pjūklų stovai: Juostinių pjūklų stovai; Skersapjūklių stovai; Stalinių pjūklų stovai
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Supporti per attrezzi > Supporti per seghe: Supporti per seghe a nastro; Supporti per troncatrice; Supporti per sega da tavolo
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Suportes para ferramentas > Suportes para serras: Suportes para serras de fita; Suportes para serras de esquadria; Suportes para serras de mesa
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Værktøjsholdere > Savholdere: Båndsavholdere; Geringssavholdere; Bordsavholdere
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 공구 스탠드 > 톱 스탠드: 밴드 톱 스탠드; 마이터 톱 스탠드; 테이블 톱 스탠드
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Βάσεις εργαλείων > Βάσεις πριονιών: Βάσεις πριονοκορδέλλας; Βάσεις πριονιών με φαλτσογωνιά; Βάσεις για επιτραπέζια πριόνια
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Стойки за инструменти > Стойки за триони: Стойки за лентови триони; Стойки за потапящ циркуляр; Стойки за настолен циркуляр
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Stojaki na narzędzia > Stojaki na piły: Stojaki na piły taśmowe; Stojaki na piły ukośnice; Stojaki na piły stołowe
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Stalci za alat > Stalci za pile: Stalci za tračne pile; Stalci za preklopne pile; Stalci za stolne pile
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Подставки и столы для инструментов > Столы для пил и пильных станков: Столы для ленточных пил; Столы для торцовочных пил; Столы для распиловочных станков
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Työkalutelineet > Sahatelineet: Vannesahatelineet; Pyörösahatelineet; Pöytäsahatelineet
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Verktøystativer > Sagstativer: Båndsagstativer; Gjæringssagstativer; Bordsagstativer